Louisiana, session 2026, HB67.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. R.S. 44:11.2(J) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
8 §11.2. Limited access to personal information for protected individuals
9 * * *
10 J. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, an individual who is
11 recognized as a protected individual shall not be exempt from publication or removal
12 of his personal information from records publicly posted by the office of the
13 secretary of state, a district clerk of court, or the board of ethics.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.